DIAGNOSTICS - ENGINE

00000000

DTC PO 120/41| Throttle/Pedal Position Sensor/Switch ”A”
Circuit

DTC PO 122/41| Throttle/Pedal Position Sensor/Switch”’A”
Circuit Low Input

DTC PO 123/41| Throttle/Pedal Position Sensor/Switch”’A”
Circuit High Input

DTC P0220/4 1| Throttle/Pedal Position Sensor/Switch ”B”
Circuit

DTC P0222/4 1| Throttle/Pedal Position Sensor/Switch ”B”
Circuit Low Input

DTC P0223/4 1| Throttle/Pedal Position Sensor/Switch’B”
Circuit High Input

DTC P2 135/41| Throttle/Pedal Position Sensor/Switch
”A”/’B” Voltage Correction

HINT:

This is the purpose for the "throttle position sensor”.
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CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
HINT:

«  ThisElectrical Throttle Control System (ETCS) does notuse a throttle cable.

. Thisthrottle positionsensorisanon  —contacttype.
The throttle position sensor is mounted on the throttle body and it detects the opening angle of the throttle
valve. This sensor is electronically controlled and uses Hall -effectelements, sothataccurate controland
reliability can be obtained. Thethrottle position sensor has 2 sensor elements/signal outputs: VTA 1 and
VTA2.VTA 1 usedtodetectthe throttle opening angle and VTA2is used to detect malfunctions in VTA 1.Volt-
ageappliedtoVTA 1 andVTA2change between 0V and5Vinproportiontothe openingangle ofthe throttle
valve. There are several checks that the engine control ECU performs to confirm proper operation of the
throttle positionsensorandVTA 1.
The engine control ECU judges the current opening angle of the throttle valve from these signals input from
terminals VTA 1 and VTA2, and the engine control ECU controls the throttle motorto make the throttle valve
angle properly in response to driver inputs.

Fail Safe Angle

Throttle Position Sensor  Engine Control ECU

Throttle Position Sensor Output Voltage (V)

Magnet
ICNo. 1
VC {?’ 0‘ Usable Range '84
% % Throttle Valve Opening Angle (deg)
E VTA1 l
VTA2
E2
V — Throttle Valve Fully Closed
(Throttle Position expressed as percentage
IC No.2 (VTA1) 10t020%)
Throttle Valve Fully Opened
Magnet (Throttle Position expressed as percentage
(VTA1) 641096%)
*1: FailSafe Angle7 °
(Throttle Position expressed as percentage
(VTA1)about 10t024%)
A19755 A21037
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Trouble Area

DIAGNOSTICS - ENGINE
DTC No. DTC Detection Condition
Condition (a) of DTCPO 120, P0 122, P0 123, P0220, P0222 or P0223 continues
for 2 sec.

(Open or short in the throttle control motor and sensor circuit)

Detection conditions for DTCs PO
fied but condition (a) is satisfied

122andP0 123arenotsatis

¢ Throttle control motor and sensor

. After confirming DTCs, use the hand

closed throttle position switch condition.
e THROTTLEPOSmeansVTA 1 signalaswellasthe THROTTLE POS #2forthe VTA2signal.
Reference (Normal condition):

P0120/41
/ (@)VTA1is”0.2Vorless’orVTA 1 is”4.8Vormore” « Engine control ECU
(1 tripdetectionlogic)
* Throttle control motor and sensor
(a)VTA 1 is0.2Vorless e ShortinVTA 1 circuit
P0122/41 ) . . . Lo
(1 tripdetectionlogic) *OpeninVCcircuit
* Engine control ECU
* Throttle control motor and sensor
*OpeninVTA 1 circuit
(a)VTA 1 is4.8Vormore P . L
P0123/41 ) . . ¢ OpeninE2circuit
(1 tripdetectionlogic) L .
*VCandVTA 1 circuitareshort -circuited
* Engine control ECU
Detection conditions for DTCs P0222 and P0223 are not satis-
fied but condition (a) is satisfied
) ) * Throttle control motor and sensor
P0220/41 (a) VTA2is”0.5Vorless”’orVTA2is”4.8V ormore” and .
L , . , * Engine control ECU
VTA1is”0.2Vormore”’andVTA  1is” 1.8Vorless’
(1 tripdetectionlogic)
* Throttle control motor and sensor
(a) VTA2is 0.5V or less * Shortin VTA2 circuit
P0222/41 ) . ) . .
(1 tripdetectionlogic) *OpeninVCcircuit
* Engine control ECU
* Throttle control motor and sensor
(a) VTA2 is "4.8 V or more” and *OpeninVTA2circuit
P0223/41 VTA1is”0.2Vormore”andVTA  1is” 1.8Vorless” ¢ Openin E2circuit
(1 tripdetectionlogic) *VCandVTA2circuitareshort  —circuited
* Engine control ECU
Condition (a) continues for 0.5 sec. or more, or
condition (b) continues for 0.4 sec. or more: *VTA1 andVTA2circuitareshort  -circuited
P2135/41 (a) DifferencebetweenVTA 1 andVTA2is0.02Vorless « Throttle control motor and sensor
(b)VTA 1is”0.2Vorless”’andVTA2is”0.5V orless” * Engine control ECU
(1 tripdetectionlogic)
HINT:

-heldtesterto confirmthe throttle valve opening percentage and

Tester display Accelerator pedal fully released Accelerator pedal fully depressed
THROTTLE POS 10t0 24 % 66 to 98%
THROTTLE POS #2 211t03.1V 45t05.0V
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MONITOR DESCRIPTION

The engine control ECU uses throttle position sensor to monitor the throttle valve opening angle.
(a) Thereis a specific voltage difference expected between VTA 1 and VTA2foreachthrottle opening
angle.
. Ifthe differencebetweenVTA 1 andVTA2isincorrectthe engine control ECU interprets this as afault
and will set a DTC.
(b) VTA 1 and VTA2 each have a specific voltage operatingrange.
. IfVTA 1 orVTA2is out ofthe normal operating range the engine control ECU interprets this as a fault
and will set a DTC.
(c) VTA 1 and VTA2 should never be closeto the same voltage levels.
. IfVTA 1 iswithin0.02 V of VTA2the engine control ECU interprets this as a short circuitin the throttle
position sensor system and will set a DTC.
This monitor runs for 2 seconds (for first 2 seconds of engine idle) after the engine started.

FAIL SAFE

If the ETCS (Electronic Throttle Control System) has a malfunction, the engine control ECU cuts off current

to the throttle control motor. The throttle control valve returns to a predetermined opening angle (approxi-
mately 16°) by the force of the return spring. The engine control ECU then adjusts the engine output by con-

trolling the fuelinfection (intermittentfuel  —cut) andignitiontiming in accordance with the accelerator pedal
opening angle to enable the vehicle to continue at a minimum speed.

If the accelerator pedal is depressed firmly and slowly, the vehicle can be driven slowly.

Ifa”pass” conditionis detected and then the ignition switch isturned OFF, thefalil -safe operation will stop
and the system will return to normal condition.

WIRING DIAGRAM

T23
Throttle Control
Motor and Sensor Engine Control ECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:

S If DTCs related to different system that have terminal E2 as the ground terminal are output simulta-
neously, terminal E2 may have an open circuit.

S Read freeze frame data using the hand-held tester. Freeze frame data records the engine conditions
when a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, freeze frame data can help determine if the
vehicle was running or stopped, if the engine was warmed up or not, if the air—fuel ratio was lean or
rich, as well as other data from the time when a malfunction occurred.

Hand-held tester:

1 | Connect hand-held tester, and read the voltage for throttle position sensor data.

PREPARATION:

(@) Connect the hand—held tester to the DLC3.

(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON and push the hand—held tester main switch ON.

(c) Enter the following menus: DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DATA LIST / ALL / THROTTLE POS and
THROTTLE POS #2.

CHECK:
Read voltage value displayed on the hand—-held tester.
OK.:
RESULT:
Throttle position expressed as percentage and voltage
Accelerator pedal released Accelerator pedal depressed
Trouble area Proceed to
THROTTLE POS THROTTLE POS #2 THROTTLE POS THROTTLE POS #2
(VTAL) (VTA2) (VTAL) (VTA2)
0% 0to 0.2V 0% 0to 0.2V VC circuit open
100 % 45t05.0V 100 % 45t05.0V E2 circuit open
21t03.1V 21t03.1V VTAL circuit open or
0, 0, 0, 0,
0% or 100 % (Fail safe) 0% or 100 % (Fail safe) ground short A
bout 16 % bout 16 % VTA2 circuit
a Ol.J ° 0t00.20r4.5t05.0V a Ol.J ° 0to0.20r4.5t05.0V ciredit open or
(Fail safe) (Fail safe) ground short
4 t % 45t05.0V Throttl iti -
10to 24 % 2.15t03.05V 6 096. > ° 059 0 .e p.OS.,I fon sen B
(Does not fail safe) (Does not fail safe) sor circuit is normal

B > Go to step 5.
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and throttle position sensor.

2 | Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine control ECU

Wire Harness Side
@ Throttle Body Connector

3]4]5]s]

]
O 1,
L

\_‘_I

E2  via2 vc VA
Front View A21022

mmm I
@ IIIH_iIi_LHiIIIIIIIIIJ

PREPARATION:

(a) Disconnectthe T23 throttle control motor and sensor con-

nector.

(b) Disconnect the E7 engine control ECU connector.

CHECK:

Check the resistance between the wire harness side connec-

tors.
OK:

Tester Connection

Specified Condition

VC (T23-5) - VC (E7-18)

VTA (T23-6) - VTAL (E7-21)

VTA2 (T23-4) - VTA2 (E7-31)

E2 (T23-3) - E2 (E7-28)

Below 1 Q

Engine Control ECU
VTA2 E2  Connector
Y A21023

VC (T23-5) or VC (E7-18) -
Body ground

VTA (T23-6) or VTAL (E7-21) -
Body ground

VTA2 (T23-4) or VTA2 (E7-31) -
Body ground

10 k< or higher

OK

2UZ-FE ENGINE SUP (RM1113E)

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.
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3 [ Check voltage between terminals VC and E2 of engine control ECU connector.

Wire Harness Side: PREPARATION:

@ Throttle Body Connector (@)

CHECK:

Disconnect the T23 throttle control motor and sensor con-
nector.
(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.

Measure the voltage between the specified terminals of the E7
engine control ECU connector.

E2 VTA2 VC VIA OK:
Front View A21022 Tester Connection Specified Condition
VC (E7-18) - E2 (E7-28) 451055V
VC (+)

\
FTTTT XA T [T TTTT 113
(SSSaEESANAEESEEENSSES EEESREEREN
(T |'|'|'|‘A‘|‘|"‘|‘|""‘|‘|’J

S s

@ E2 (_)Engine Control ECU

Y Connector A21038
NG

Replace engine control ECU (See Pub. No.
RM630E, page FI-74).

OK

4 | Replace throttle body (See Pub. No. RM630E, page FI-42).

Go
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5 [Check if DTC output recur.

PREPARATION:

(@) Clearthe DTC (See page DI-3).

(b) Start the engine.

(¢) Run the engine at idle for 15 seconds or more.

CHECK:
Read the DTC (See page DI-3).
RESULT:
Display (DTC Output) Proceed to
"P0120, P0122, P0123, P0220, POZZ?, P0223 and/or P2135" are output A
again
No DTC output B

B > System is OK.

Replace engine control ECU (See Pub. No.
RMG630E, page FI-74).

2UZ-FE ENGINE SUP (RM1113E)
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When not using hand-held tester:

1

and throttle position sensor.

Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine control ECU

Wire Harness Side
@ Throttle Body Connector

41316
=
\ J

E2 VTA2 VC VIA
Front View A21022

i EEanEEN K|
@ IIIIIIIMKIIIIIIIII\

— — & —

PREPARATION:

(a) Disconnectthe T23 throttle control motor and sensor con-

nector.

(b) Disconnect the E7 engine control ECU connector.

CHECK.:

Check the resistance between the wire harness side connec-

tors.
OK:

Tester Connection

Specified Condition

VC (T23-5) - VC (E7-18)

VTA (T23-6) - VTAL (E7-21)

VTA2 (T23-4) - VTA2 (E7-31)

E2 (T23-3) - E2 (E7-28)

Below 1 Q

) —E2 ,
Engine Control
VTA1 VTA2 ECU Connector
Y A21023

VC (T23-5) or VC (E7-18) -
Body ground

VTA (T23-6) or VTAL (E7-21) -
Body ground

VTA2 (T23-4) or VTA2 (E7-31) -
Body ground

10 k< or higher

OK

2UZ-FE ENGINE SUP (RM1113E)

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.
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2 | Check voltage between terminals VC and E2 of engine control ECU connector.

Wire Harness Side: PREPARATION:
@ Throttle Body Connector (a) Disconnectthe T23 throttle control motor and sensor con-
nector.
(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:

Measure the voltage between the specified terminals of the E7
engine control ECU connector.

E2 VTA2 VC VIA OK:
Front View A21022 Tester Connection Specified Condition
VC (E7-18) - E2 (E7-28) 451055V
VC (+)

\
FTTTT XA T [T TTTT 113
(SSSaEESANAEESEEENSSES EEESREEREN
(T |'|'|'|‘A‘|‘|"‘|‘|""‘|‘|’J

Y Connector A21038 )
NG Replace engine control ECU (See Pub. No.
RM630E, page FI-74).

OK

3 | Replace throttle body (See Pub. No. RM630E, page FI-42).

Go
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4 | Check if DTC output recur.

PREPARATION:

(@) Clearthe DTC (See page DI-3).

(b) Start the engine.

(¢) Run the engine at idle for 15 seconds or more.

CHECK:
Read the DTC (See page DI-3).
RESULT:

Display (DTC Output) Proceed to
"P0120, P0122, P0123, P0220, P0222, P0223 and/or P2135" are output A
again
No DTC output B

B > System is OK.

RMG630E, page FI-74).

Replace engine control ECU (See Pub. No.
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